Massachusetts, session 194th, H5507.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, call
firefighters, volunteer firefighters and fire engineers of the Adams fire district who would be
subject to mandatory retirement on the last day of the month in which they turn 65 years old,
and, if a member of the retirement system, would be retired for superannuation, may serve in
such position until the age of 70, until the date of retirement or non-reappointment, whichever
occurs first; provided, however, that said firefighter or fire engineer is mentally and physically
capable of performing the duties of the position. The Adams fire district may, at the employee’s
expense, require that the employee be examined by an impartial physician, acceptable to the fire
district, to determine the firefighter or fire engineer’s fitness to remain in service.
(b) No deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of said call firefighters,
volunteer firefighters and fire engineers pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws for any
service performed by such firefighters or fire engineers subsequent to reaching the age of 65 for
of 2

retirement or pension purposes. Upon retirement pursuant to this act of a firefighter or fire
engineer over the age of 65, they shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to
that which they would have been entitled had they retired at the age of 65.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2